California statutes. Financial Code
 committee is an odd number, each of whom shall be a member of the credit union. Notwithstanding any other law, a membership committee may be composed of directors, nondirectors, or both directors and nondirectors. No member of the supervisory committee or audit committee may serve on the membership committee.

(l) (1) The board of directors may, by resolution, delegate the following to an asset-liability management committee or similar committee, consistent with the policies of the board of directors:

(A) The duties set forth in subdivisions (c) and (e).

(B) The authority to determine the dividend rates on share accounts pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14901.

(2) The asset liability management committee or similar committee
 may be composed of directors, nondirector management officials, or both directors and nondirector management officials.

(3) The asset liability management committee or similar committee shall provide a report to the board of directors, at least monthly, that specifies any actions taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 305, Sec. 3.   (AB 2062)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Officers [14500. - 14502.]

14500.

(a) The officers of every credit union shall include a chairman or president, one or more vice chairmen or vice presidents, a secretary and a treasurer or chief financial officer.

(b) The officers of any credit union may include other officers with titles and duties specified in the bylaws or determined by resolution of the board as may be necessary for the conduct of its affairs. The president, or if there is no president, the chairman of the board, is the general manager and chief executive officer of the credit union, unless otherwise provided in the bylaws.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in a credit union’s bylaws, officers, other than those officers elected pursuant to Section 14454 and required pursuant to subdivision (a), shall be chosen by the board and serve at the pleasure of the board, subject to the rights, if any, of an officer under any contract of employment. Any officer may resign at any time upon written notice to the corporation without prejudice to the rights, if any, of the corporation under any contract or obligation with the credit union to which the officer is a party. An officer other than those officers required pursuant to subdivision (a), may, but need not be, a director of the credit union.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 951, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

14501.

If the bylaws so provide, the directors may elect the same person as secretary and treasurer or chief financial officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 951, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

14502.

The powers and duties of the officers of any credit union required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14500 are as prescribed in the bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 951, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Supervisory Committee [14550. - 14556.]

14550.

Every credit union shall have a supervisory committee of at least three persons, provided that the number of members on the committee is an odd number, each of whom shall be a member of the credit union and elected by the members of the credit union. In the alternative, the board of directors may establish an audit committee subject to the requirements of Section 14556.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 353, Sec. 5.   (AB 2274)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14551.

The supervisory committee may:

(a) Suspend at any time by unanimous vote, at a meeting called for that purpose, the credit committee, or any member thereof, or the credit manager, or any member of the board of directors, or any officer.

(b) By a majority vote call a meeting of the members to consider any violation of this division or the bylaws, or any practices of the credit union which, in the opinion of the committee, are unsafe
 or unauthorized.

(c) Inspect the securities, cash, and accounts of the credit union.

(d) Fill vacancies in the supervisory committee until the next annual meeting of the members.

(e) Declare vacant any office of a member of the supervisory committee if such member is absent from three consecutive regular meetings of the supervisory committee unless excused therefrom or is completely inactive as a member of the supervisory committee for a consecutive 12 months’ period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14551.5.

The supervisory committee shall be responsible for reviewing the credit union’s policies and control procedures to safeguard against fraud and self-dealing, and the supervisory committee shall exercise whatever efforts are necessary pursuant to Sections 14551 and 14553 to meet those responsibilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 330, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14552.

The supervisory committee shall, within seven days after suspension of any or all members of the credit committee, or any member of the board of directors, or any other officer, cause notice of a special meeting to be given to the members to take such action regarding the suspension as the members deem necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 951, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

14553.

(a) The supervisory committee shall at least once each year make or cause to be made an audit of the books and records and an examination of the business and affairs of the credit union. The supervisory committee shall make a full report of the assets and liabilities, receipts and disbursements of the credit union to the board of directors. Those reports shall be presented at the annual meeting of members and filed with the records of the credit union.

(b) The supervisory
 committee may make or cause to be made any supplementary inspections of the securities, cash, and accounts of the credit union or audits as it deems necessary, and submit reports of those audits to the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14554.

No member of the supervisory committee shall serve as a member of the credit committee, as the credit manager, as a member of the board of directors, or as an employee of the credit union.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 691, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

14555.

The commissioner may, after investigation and finding that the supervisory committee is not performing in conformance with this article, declare all offices of the supervisory committee of a credit union vacant and shall direct the board of directors of the credit union to call a special meeting of the members for the purpose of electing a new supervisory committee to serve until the next regular annual meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 811.)
-------------------------------------------

14556.

(a) The board of directors may, by resolution, establish an audit committee in lieu of a supervisory committee. An audit committee that meets all the requirements of this section shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements for a supervisory committee set forth in Sections 14550 to 14555, inclusive, or in any applicable bylaw provision.

(b) The vote of the board of directors to establish an audit committee in lieu of a supervisory committee shall be affirmed by a majority vote of members voting. A membership vote may occur at any regular or special meeting of the members, or by written ballot subject to Section 7513 of the Corporations Code. Following the
 affirmative vote of the membership, the supervisory committee shall be deemed dissolved upon the appointment of an audit committee and the adoption of appropriate amendments to the credit union bylaws, consistent with subdivision (e) of Section 14103, by the board of directors.

(c) The audit committee shall consist of at least three persons, provided that it is an odd number, each of whom shall be a member of the credit union and appointed by a majority of the board of directors.

(1) Notwithstanding the limitations of subdivision
 (b) of Section 7212 of the Corporations Code, the audit committee may be composed of directors, or both directors and nondirectors, provided that no less than a majority of the members of the audit committee at any given time shall be composed of directors.

(2) A
 member of the audit committee shall not serve as a member of the credit committee, as the credit manager, as the board chairman, or as an employee of the credit union.

(3) An audit committee member may be appointed or removed by a majority vote of the board of directors and shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The removal of an audit committee member who is also a director of the credit union, for any reason, shall not impact their status as a director.

(4) The commissioner, after investigation and finding that the audit committee is not performing in conformance with this article, may direct the board to replace any or all audit committee members.

(d) The audit committee shall carry out the responsibilities set forth in
 subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 14551 and Sections
 14551.5, 14552, and 14553 and shall:

(1) Ensure that the credit union complies with Section 14252.

(2) Ensure that the credit union maintains an effective internal audit program, including a system of internal controls and individuals with sufficient training and experience to adequately and timely review all key areas of a credit union’s operations.

(e) The board of directors may, by subsequent resolution, reestablish a supervisory committee in lieu of an audit committee, which shall be affirmed by membership vote. The audit committee shall be deemed dissolved upon the election of a supervisory committee by the membership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 762, Sec. 5.   (SB 269)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Credit Committee and Loan Officers [14600. - 14605.]

14600.

Every credit union shall have a credit committee of at least three persons, each of whom shall be a member of the credit union, or in the alternative, a credit manager, to have general supervision of all obligations of members. The bylaws of the credit union shall provide that either: (1) the members of the credit committee shall be elected by the members of the credit union at their annual meeting, or (2) they shall be appointed by the board of directors, or (3) that the board of directors may establish the position of credit manager in lieu of a credit committee. The bylaws of the credit union shall provide for the terms of office of the credit
 committee, where the credit committee has been provided for in the bylaws, which shall not exceed three years, and which may be staggered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 789, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14601.

No member of the credit committee or the credit manager or any loan officer shall serve as a member of the supervisory committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14602.

(a) (1) No credit union shall create any obligation with a credit union member, without the written approval of a majority of all the members of the credit committee, the credit manager, or a loan officer appointed as provided in this section.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to the creation of an obligation in accordance with a credit scoring program, preapproval credit program, or similar program, if the program was adopted by the board of directors,
 credit committee, or credit manager and complies with a written lending policy on programs of that type established by the board of directors in accordance with Section 15100.

(b) The credit committee or the credit manager may, with the approval of the board of directors, appoint one or more loan officers who shall be authorized to approve obligations with credit union members.

(c) Neither the credit committee, a credit manager, or any loan officer shall have the power to approve membership applications.

(d) No loan officers shall be permitted to approve any extension agreement of any obligation or the refinancing of any obligation except as prescribed in regulations promulgated by the commissioner.

(e) The credit committee, or in the alternative, the
 credit manager shall be provided with a record of each obligation approved or not approved by any loan officer, within 30 days of the approval or disapproval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14603.

The credit committee, the credit manager, or a loan officer may approve in advance, upon their own motion or upon the application of any member, the extension of credit to any member and loans may be granted to such member within the limit of such extension of credit authorized by the board of directors pursuant to Section 15100. Where an extension of credit has been approved, applications for any extension of credit need not be approved by the credit committee, the credit manager, or loan officer as long as the aggregate amount of such obligations does not exceed the limit of such extension of credit authorized by the board of directors pursuant to
 Section 15100. The credit committee, the credit manager, or loan officer shall review, from time to time, all extensions of credit approved by them and any extension of credit approved for any member shall expire if such member becomes ineligible for a loan or becomes more than 90 days delinquent in his obligations to the credit union.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 209, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14604.

A credit union member whose written application to enter into any obligation is denied, may appeal from the denial of the credit committee, the credit manager, or loan officer to the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 789, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14605.

A credit manager shall not disburse or have the authority to authorize any person to disburse the proceeds of any loan. A credit manager shall not authorize or make loans to other credit unions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 691, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Investments [14650. - 14659.]

14650.

Subject to the limitations of Sections 14402, 14403, and 14404, any credit union or credit unions may purchase, acquire and hold outstanding shares of a corporation engaged exclusively in holding property of the character described in Section 14402 and which property is or is to be used for the purposes set forth in Section 14402. The purchase or acquisition of stock of any such corporation shall be approved by two-thirds of all the directors of such credit union or credit unions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14651.

(a) Every credit union may invest in the shares of stock of a corporation, or in membership or economic interests of a limited liability company, organized solely for the purpose of providing services to credit unions, provided the corporation or limited liability company is formed by a credit union or group of credit unions.

(b) Every credit union may invest in the shares of stock of a corporation, or in membership or economic interests of a limited liability company, organized solely for the purpose of providing services to credit unions, provided the corporation or limited liability company is formed by one or more credit unions, one or more corporations or limited liability companies of the type described in subdivision
 (a), or any combination thereof.

(c) Every credit union may invest in the securities of a corporation or in membership or economic interests of a limited liability company that is not a corporation or limited liability company of the type described in subdivision (a) and that provides services to credit unions, provided the investment is approved by the commissioner.

(d) “A credit union service organization” means a corporation or limited liability company described in subdivision (a) or (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 305, Sec. 4.   (AB 2062)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14652.

Every credit union may invest in securities and other assets described in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 800) of Division 1 as legal investments for nonbank licensees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 16.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14652.5.

(a) A credit union may organize, sponsor, operate, control, or render investment advice to, an investment company, or underwrite, distribute, or sell securities of any investment company which has qualified to sell its securities in this state pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 1 of Title 4 of the Corporations Code, if the officers and employees of the credit union who sell these securities meet such standards with respect to training, experience, and sales practices as established by the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee. For the purpose of this section, “investment company” means an investment company as defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C., Sec. 80a-1 et seq.).

(b) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 18.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14653.

Credit unions may invest in a trust organized solely for the purpose of investing in United States government securities and United States government agency securities, provided the trust is formed by an organization composed of credit unions or an organization of credit union associations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14653.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a credit union may make any investment authorized by regulation or in writing by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 951, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

14654.

Credit unions may purchase from the vendor or lessor of any personal property, conditional sale contracts or vehicle lease agreements covering the sale or lease of that property or vehicle to its members. The credit union may hold and retain any such conditional sale contract or vehicle lease agreement as an investment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1570, Sec. 4.5.)
-------------------------------------------

14656.

A credit union may, in accordance with rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner, purchase from any liquidating credit union notes made by individual members of such liquidating credit union, at such prices and under such terms as may be agreed upon by the board of directors of the purchasing credit union and the board of directors, or liquidating agent, of the liquidating credit union.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14657.

(a) A credit union may invest in charitable donation accounts, or CDAs, in accordance with this section as a means of providing charitable contributions and donations to qualified charities. If a credit union invests in a CDA that satisfies all of the conditions in subdivision (b), then it may do so free from any other investment limitations of this article.

(b) (1) The book value of a credit union’s investments in all CDAs, in the aggregate, as carried on the credit union’s statement of financial condition prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, shall be limited to no more than 5 percent of the credit union’s net worth at all times for the duration of the accounts, as measured every quarterly
 call report cycle. A credit union shall bring its aggregate accounts into compliance with the maximum aggregate funding limit within 30 days of any breach of this limit.

(2) The assets of a CDA shall be held in a segregated custodial account or special purpose entity and shall be specifically identified as a CDA.

(3) If a credit union chooses to establish a CDA using a trust vehicle, the trustee shall be regulated by a federal regulatory agency, or a state financial regulatory agency. A regulated trustee or other person or entity that is authorized to make investment decisions for a CDA (manager), other than the credit union itself, shall be either: (A) a registered investment adviser; or (B) regulated by a federal regulatory agency or a state financial regulatory agency.

(4) The parties to the CDA, typically the
 funding credit union and trustee or other manager of the account, shall document the terms and conditions controlling the account in a written agreement. The terms of the agreement shall be consistent with this section. The board of directors shall adopt written policies governing the creation, funding, and management of a CDA that are consistent with this section, shall review the policies annually, and may amend the policies from time to time. A credit union’s CDA agreement and policies, at a minimum, shall comply with all of the following:

(A) Provide that the CDA shall make charitable contributions and donations only to qualified charities.

(B) Document the investment strategies and risk tolerances the CDA trustee or other manager is required to follow in administering the account.

(C) Provide that the credit
 union shall account for all aspects of the CDA, including, but not limited to, distributions to charities and liquidation of the account, in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

(D) Indicate the frequency with which the trustee or manager of the CDA shall make distributions to qualified charities, as provided in paragraph (5).

(5) A credit union shall distribute to one or more qualified charities, at least once every five years, and upon termination of a CDA, regardless of the length of its term, a minimum of 51 percent of the account’s total return on assets over the period of up to five years. Other than upon termination, the credit union may choose how frequently CDA distributions to charity shall be made during each period of up to five years. The credit union may choose to make periodic distributions over a period of up to five years, or only a single
 distribution as required at the end of that period. A credit union may choose to donate in excess of the minimum distribution frequency and amount.

(6) Upon termination of the CDA, the credit union may receive a distribution of the remaining account assets in cash or a distribution in kind of the remaining account assets, but only if those assets are permissible investments for credit unions.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Affiliate” means an entity in which the credit union has any ownership interest directly or indirectly. “Affiliate” does not apply to ownership due to the funding of employee benefits.

(2) “Charitable contributions and donations” are gifts credit unions provide to assist qualified charities
 through contributions of staff, equipment, money, or other resources.

(3) “Charitable donation account” or “CDA” is a hybrid charitable and investment vehicle that satisfies the conditions set forth in subdivision (b).

(4) “Distribution in kind” means the credit union’s acceptance of remaining CDA assets, upon termination of the account, in their original form instead of in cash resulting from the liquidation of the assets.

(5) “Qualified charity” means a charitable organization or other nonprofit entity recognized as exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(6) “Registered investment adviser” means an investment adviser registered with the Securities Exchange Commission pursuant to the Investment Advisers Act of
 1940.

(7) “Total return” means the actual rate of return on all investments in a CDA over a given period of up to five years, including realized interest, capital gains, dividends, and distributions, but exclusive of account fees and expenses provided they were not paid to the credit union that established the CDA or to any of its affiliates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 267, Sec. 3.   (AB 2862)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14659.

(a) A credit union that is investing to fund an employee benefit plan obligation may purchase an investment that would otherwise be impermissible if the investment is directly related to the credit union’s obligation or potential obligation under the employee benefit plan and the credit union holds the investment only for as long as it has an actual or potential obligation under the employee benefit plan.

(b) For purposes of this section, specific authorization pursuant to Section 14653.5 is not required.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 267, Sec. 4.   (AB 2862)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Reserves [14700. - 14703.]

14700.

Every credit union shall create and maintain a regular reserve as specified by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14701.

Losses incurred by a credit union may be charged to its regular reserve as permitted by rule of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 765, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14702.

In addition to the regular reserve, special reserves shall be established when required by regulation or when found necessary by the board of directors of the credit union or by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1097, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

14703.

A credit union shall establish and maintain an allowance-for-loan-losses account in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. The commissioner may order the credit union to increase the amount of its allowance-for-loan-losses account if the commissioner finds that the amount of the account is not adequate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 324, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Penalties [14750. - 14768.]

14750.

Except as provided in Section 14950, any officer, director, member of a committee of a credit union, loan officer appointed pursuant to Section 14602, or employee who knowingly permits the creation of an obligation with, or participates in the creation of an obligation with, a nonmember of the credit union, or knowingly permits the creation of an obligation or participates in the creation of an obligation which is not made in conformity with the requirements of this division, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 148, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14751.

Any officer, director, member of a committee, credit manager, or loan officer appointed pursuant to Section 14602 who violates Section 14750 is primarily liable to the credit union for the amount of any obligation that was created in violation of Section 14750. The illegality of the creation of the obligation is no defense in an action by the credit union to recover any amounts owing as a result of any obligation created in violation of Section 14750.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 789, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

14752.

Except as provided for in Section 14051 and this article, any person who willfully violates any provision of this division, or who willfully violates any rule or order issued pursuant to this division, shall upon conviction be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for not more than one
 year, or be punished by both that fine and imprisonment, but no person may be imprisoned for the violation of any rule or order unless he or she had knowledge of the rule or order. Conviction under this section shall not bar the exercise of the administrative authority of the commissioner provided in Section 14208.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 108.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

14753.

Any director, officer, or employee of a credit union who asks for, receives, or agrees to receive any money, property, or thing of value for his personal benefit or advantage for (a) procuring or attempting to procure for any person any loan from that credit union, (b) for the purchase or discount of any note, draft, check, bill of exchange, or other obligation by that credit union, or (c) for permitting any person to overdraw any account with that credit union, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 673, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14754.

Any director, officer, or employee of a credit union who knowingly overdraws his or her account with that credit union, except for any overdraft pursuant to an agreement which is approved in advance as provided in Section 14603 and which is in conformity with Section 15050, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 673, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14755.

Any director, officer, agent, or employee of any credit union who knowingly receives or possesses the credit union’s property otherwise than in payment of a just demand with intent to defraud, omits to make or omits to cause to be made a full and true entry thereof in the credit union’s books and accounts, or concurs in omitting to make any material entry thereof, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 673, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14756.

Any director, officer, agent, or employee of a credit union who (1) knowingly concurs in making or publishing any written report, exhibit, or statement of the credit union’s affairs or financial condition containing any material statement which is false, or (2) having the custody of the credit union’s books, willfully refuses or neglects to make any proper entry in those books as required by law, or (3) refuses to allow the books to be inspected or extracts to be taken therefrom by the commissioner or the commissioner’s deputies or examiners, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 673, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14758.

Any director, officer, or employee of a credit union who makes or maintains, or attempts to make or maintain, a deposit of the credit union’s funds with any other person on the condition or with the understanding, whether express or implied, that the person receiving that deposit will make a loan or advance, directly or indirectly, to any director, officer, or employee of the credit union is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 673, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

14759.

Any officer, director, employee, or agent of any credit union who willfully makes a false or untrue entry in any book, record, report, statement concerning the business or affairs of the credit union, or statement of condition or in connection with any transaction of the credit union with intent to deceive any officer or director thereof, or with intent to deceive any agent or examiner, whether private or public, employed or lawfully appointed to examine into the credit union’s condition or to examine into any of the credit union’s affairs or transactions, or with intent to deceive any public officer, office, or board to which the credit union is required
 by law to report or which has authority by law to examine into the credit union’s affairs or transactions or to examine into any of the credit union’s affairs or transactions or who, with like intent, willfully omits to make a new entry of any matter particularly pertaining to the business, property, condition, affairs, transactions, assets, or accounts of the credit union in any book, record, report, or statement of the credit union, or who with like intent alters, abstracts, conceals, or destroys any book, record, report, or statement of the credit union made, written, or kept, or required to be made, written, or kept by him or her or under his or her direction, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 673, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

14760.

(a) Every director of a credit union is guilty of a misdemeanor who: 

(1) In case of the fraudulent insolvency of that credit union, has participated in the fraud; or

(2) Willfully does any act in his or her capacity as director which is expressly forbidden by law or willfully omits to perform any duty imposed upon him or her as such a director by law.

(b) The insolvency of a credit union is deemed fraudulent for the purposes of this section,
 unless its affairs appear upon investigation to have been administered lawfully and with the same care and diligence that agents receiving a compensation for their services are bound to observe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 673, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

14761.

Any officer or agent of any credit union who makes or delivers any guaranty or endorsement on behalf of the credit union whereby the credit union may become liable upon any of the credit union’s discounted notes, bills, or obligations in a sum beyond the amount of loans and discounts which the credit union may lawfully make, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 673, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

14762.

A director of a credit union who concurs in any vote or act of the directors of the credit union by which it is intended to make a loan or discount to any director of the credit union exceeding the amount allowed by law, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 673, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

14763.

Any officer or employee of any credit union who intentionally conceals from the directors of the credit union any discounts or loans made by the credit union between the regular meetings of its board of directors, or intentionally conceals the purchase of any securities or the sale of the credit union’s securities during that period, or who knowingly fails to report to the board of directors when required to do so by law all discounts or loans made by the credit union and all securities purchased or sold by the credit union between the regular meetings of its board of directors, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 673, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

14764.

No credit union shall purchase any real or personal property or any interest in real or personal property, including, but not limited to, a leasehold, or any contract arising from the sale of real or personal property or any note or bond in which any officer, director, or employee of the credit union is personally or financially interested, directly or indirectly, for that person’s own account or as the partner or agent of others, without first obtaining the written consent of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 673, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

14765.

(a) An officer, as described in Section 14500, a director, or an employee of a credit union shall not purchase, directly or indirectly, or be interested in the purchase of, any of the credit union’s assets for an amount less than the then current market value. Every person who violates this section shall be liable to the people of this state for each offense in an amount of up to twice the market value of the assets purchased.

(b) In calculating the market value of an asset, the credit union may use the average value of two valuations of the asset from two separate third parties recognized in the industry for establishing market value in connection with a private-party purchase and sale of comparable assets.

(c) This section shall not apply to the purchase of used credit union equipment or furnishings by an officer or director if the current market value of the asset or assets purchased does not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) in the aggregate.

(d) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the credit union from making a gift to an officer or director if the current market value of the gift or gifts does not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) in the aggregate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 305, Sec. 5.   (AB 2062)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14766.

(a) An officer, as described in Section 14500, a director, or an employee of a credit union shall not purchase, directly or indirectly, or be interested in the purchase of, any of the credit union’s obligations for an amount less than the book value thereof, unless all the directors of the credit union previously approve the purchase by resolution and a copy of the resolution is delivered to the commissioner immediately after adoption. Every person who violates this section shall be liable to the people of this state for each offense in an amount of up to twice the book value of the obligations purchased.

(b) The method used for determining book value shall be set forth in a written policy governing the sale of credit union
 obligations established and approved by the board of directors. The method used shall be consistent with generally accepted accounting principles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 305, Sec. 6.   (AB 2062)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14767.

It is unlawful for any person willfully to make any untrue statement of a material fact in any document filed with the commissioner under this division, or willfully to omit to state in any document any material fact which is required to be stated therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 651, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14768.

Any officer, director, employee, or agent of any credit union who abstracts or willfully misapplies any of the money, funds, or property of the credit union, or willfully misapplies its credit, is guilty of a felony. Upon conviction, the court shall, in addition to any other punishment imposed, order the person to make full restitution to the credit union. Nothing in this section shall be deemed or construed to repeal, amend, or impair any existing provision of law prescribing a punishment for such an offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 947, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Members [14800. - 14822.]

14800.

(a) Every credit union may admit to membership those persons qualified for membership upon the occurrence of any of the following:

(1) Upon the purchase of a membership in the credit union as provided in the credit union’s bylaws.

(2) Upon the payment of an entrance fee established from time to time by the board of directors.

(3) Upon the purchase of
 one or more shares in the credit union as provided in the credit union’s bylaws.
